Hawaii statutes.
§431:15-338 Disposition of records during
and after termination of liquidation. Whenever it shall appear to the
commissioner that the records of any insurer in process of liquidation or
completely liquidated are no longer useful, the commissioner may recommend to
the court and the court shall direct what records should be retained for future
reference and what should be destroyed. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next